test/src/morphology/V-ristjmae86_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `ristʼmä: # Verb (86) `ristʼmä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `ristʼmä+V+Inf/mA: `ristʼmä
     `ristʼmä+V+Inf: `ristiq
     `ristʼmä+V+ActPrtPrc: `ristʼnüq
     `ristʼmä+V+PssPrtPrc: ristit
     `ristʼmä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: risti
     `ristʼmä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: ristʼ
     `ristʼmä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: [ristʼe, `ristʼse]
     `ristʼmä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [`ristʼe, `ristʼse]
